Utah statutes.
73-5a-106.   Dams classified according to hazard and use.
(1)  Dams shall be classified according to hazard and use.
(2)  Hazard classifications are as follows:
(a)  high hazard - those dams which, if they fail, have a high probability of
causing loss of human life or extensive economic loss, including damage to
critical public utilities;
(b)  moderate hazard - those dams which, if they fail, have a low probability
of causing loss of human life, but would cause appreciable property damage,
including damage to public utilities; and
(c)  low hazard - those dams which, if they fail, would cause minimal threat
to human life, and economic losses would be minor or limited to damage
sustained by the owner of the structure.
(3)  Use classifications are as follows:
(a)  water storage - dams which impound water for prolonged periods, including
those built for irrigation, power generation, water supply, aquatic culture,
and recreation;
(b)  flood control - dams constructed to operate only during significant
runoff events and which impound water for a small percentage of time,
including those built for flood control or sediment control and debris basins;
(c)  tailings - dams in which a large component of the material impounded
consists of saturated solids; and
(d)  other - dams which impound a minimal amount of water or where the head
behind the dam is minimal, including stock ponds, wash water ponds,
recirculated process water ponds, regulating reservoirs, and diversion dams.
